Utah statutes.
53A-29-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Cooperating employer" means a public or private entity which, as part of a work experience and career exploration program offered through a school, provides interns with training and work experience in activities related to the entity's ongoing business activities.

(2)  "Intern" means a student enrolled in a school-sponsored work experience and career exploration program under Section 53A-29-102 involving both classroom instruction and work experience with a cooperating employer, for which the student receives no compensation.

(3)  "Internship" means the work experience segment of an intern's school-sponsored work experience and career exploration program, performed under the direct supervision of a cooperating employer.

(4)  "Private school" means a school serving any of grades 7 through 12 which is not part of the public education system.

(5)  "Public school" means:

(a)  a public school district;

(b)  an applied technology center or applied technology service region;

(c)  the Schools for the Deaf and the Blind; or

(d)  other components of the public education system authorized by the State Board of Education to offer internships.

